Utah statutes.
76-5-201.   Criminal homicide -- Elements -- Designations of offenses.

(1) (a) Except as provided in Subsections (3) and (4), a person commits criminal homicide if the person intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, with criminal negligence, or acting with a mental state otherwise specified in the statute defining the offense, causes the death of another human being, including an unborn child at any stage of its development.

(b)  There shall be no cause of action for criminal homicide for the death of an unborn child caused by an abortion, as defined in Section 76-7-301.

(2)  Criminal homicide is aggravated murder, murder, manslaughter, child abuse homicide, homicide by assault, negligent homicide, or automobile homicide.

(3)  A person is not guilty of criminal homicide of an unborn child if the sole reason for the death of the unborn child is that the person:

(a)  refused to consent to:

(i)  medical treatment; or

(ii)  a cesarean section; or

(b)  failed to follow medical advice.

(4)  A woman is not guilty of criminal homicide of her own unborn child if the death of her unborn child:

(a)  is caused by a criminally negligent act or reckless act of the woman; and

(b)  is not caused by an intentional or knowing act of the woman.

